Utah statutes.
41-6a-205.   Government-owned vehicles subject to chapter.
Except as specifically exempted, the provisions of this chapter applicable to
an operator of a vehicle on the highway apply to an operator of a vehicle
owned or operated by the United States, this state or any county, city, town,
district or any other political subdivision of the state.
